src/morphology/roots/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_ORD_SUFFIX
[WORD_ID=kymmenes]:kymmenes # ;
[WORD_ID=sadas]:sadas # ;
[WORD_ID=tuhannes]:tuhannes # ;
[WORD_ID=miljoonas]:miljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=miljardis]:miljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=biljoonas]:biljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=biljardis]:biljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=triljoonas]:triljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=triljardis]:triljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=kvadriljoonas]:kvadriljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=kvadriljardis]:kvadriljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=kvintiljoonas]:kvintiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=kvintiljardis]:kvintiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=sekstiljoonas]:sekstiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=sekstiljardis]:sekstiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=oktiljoonas]:oktiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=oktiljardis]:oktiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=noviljoonas]:noviljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=noviljardis]:noviljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=undekiljoonas]:undekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=undekiljardis]:undekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=duodekiljoonas]:duodekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=duodekiljardis]:duodekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=tredekiljoonas]:tredekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=tredekiljardis]:tredekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=kvattuordekiljoonas]:kvattuordekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=kvattuordekiljardis]:kvattuordekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=kvindekiljoonas]:kvindekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=kvindekiljardis]:kvindekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=sedekiljoonas]:sedekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=sedekiljardis]:sedekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=septendekiljoonas]:septendekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=septendekiljardis]:septendekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=oktodekiljoonas]:oktodekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=oktodekiljardis]:oktodekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=novemdekiljoonas]:novemdekiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=novemdekiljardis]:novemdekiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=vidingtiljoonas]:vidingtiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=vidingtiljardis]:vidingtiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=tridingtiljoonas]:tridingtiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=tridingtiljardis]:tridingtiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=sentiljoonas]:sentiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=sentiljardis]:sentiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=kiljoonas]:kiljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=kiljardis]:kiljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=piljoonas]:piljoonas # ;
[WORD_ID=piljardis]:piljardis # ;
[WORD_ID=toista]:toista # ;
[WORD_ID=kolmatta]:kolmatta # ;
[WORD_ID=neljättä]:neljättä # ;
[WORD_ID=kuudetta]:kuudetta # ;
[WORD_ID=viidettä]:viidettä # ;
[WORD_ID=seitsemättä]:seitsemättä # ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksatta]:kahdeksatta # ;
[WORD_ID=yhdeksättä]:yhdeksättä # ;
[WORD_ID=kymmenettä]:kymmenettä # ;
[WORD_ID=toista]:toista # ;
[WORD_ID=kolmatta]:kolmatta # ;
[WORD_ID=neljättä]:neljättä # ;
[WORD_ID=kuudetta]:kuudetta # ;
[WORD_ID=viidettä]:viidettä # ;
[WORD_ID=seitsemättä]:seitsemättä # ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksatta]:kahdeksatta # ;
[WORD_ID=yhdeksättä]:yhdeksättä # ;
[WORD_ID=kymmenettä]:kymmenettä # ;

LEXICON NUM_OTHERS
[WORD_ID=yksisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:yksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=kaksisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:kaksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=yhtisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:yhtisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=kahtisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:kahtisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=kolmisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:kolmisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=nelisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:nelisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=viitisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:viitisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=kuutisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:kuutisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=seitsemisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:seitsemisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:kahdeksisen#  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=yhdeksisen][POS=NUMERAL]#:yhdeksisen#    NUM_CARD_SUFFIX   ;
[WORD_ID=pari][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD]:par           NUM_PARI ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:puolitta#kymmenittä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:puolilta#kymmeniltä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:puolilla#kymmenillä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:puolille#kymmenille  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:puolista#kymmenistä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:puolina#kymmeninä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolien#kymmenien    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolten#kymmenien    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:puolissa#kymmenissä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:puolet#kymmenet   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:puolia#kymmeniä      NUM_FRONT_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi#kymmenikse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi#kymmeniksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:puoletta#kymmennettä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:puolelta#kymmenneltä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:puolella#kymmennellä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:puolelle#kymmennelle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:puolesta#kymmennestä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:puolena#kymmennenä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:puolen#kymmennen  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:puolessa#kymmennessä  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli#kymmentä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli#kymmentä  NUM_FRONT_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:puolta#kymmentä     NUM_FRONT_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi#kymmennekse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=puolikymmentä][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi#kymmenneksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:puolitta#sadoitta  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:puolilta#sadoilta  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:puolilla#sadoilla  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:puolille#sadoille  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:puolista#sadoista  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:puolina#satoina  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolien#satojen    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolten#satojen    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:puolissa#sadoissa  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:puolet#sadat  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:puolia#satoja     NUM_FRONT_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi#sadoikse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi#sadoiksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:puoletta#sadatta  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:puolelta#sadalta  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:puolella#sadalla  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:puolelle#sadalle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:puolesta#sadasta  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:puolena#satana    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:puolen#sadan  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:puolessa#sadassa  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli#sataa  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli#sataa  NUM_FRONT_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:puolta#sataa   NUM_FRONT_POSS ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoleksi#sadakse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;
[WORD_ID=puolisataa][POS=NUMERAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoleksi#sadaksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM_YKSI
0:ksi   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:hte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hde   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:h     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI
0:ksi   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:hte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:hde   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:h     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ks    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME
0:e     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS ; 

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄ
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä    ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN    ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_VIISI
0:si    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:de    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;

LEXICON NUM_KUUSI
0:si    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:de    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;


LEXICON NUM_KAHDEKSAN
0:an    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_YHDEKSÄN
0:än    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä    ;
0:ä     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN    ;
0:ä     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ä     NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENEN
0:en    NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:e     NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0       NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_SATA
0:ta    NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:da    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:do    NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN    ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA   ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN   ;
0:ta    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT
0:t     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nne   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:n     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
